Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-7302
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that:

(1) The state has a compelling government interest in protecting the health and safety of its citizens, especially vulnerable children;

(2) Genital and nongenital gender-altering surgeries are generally not recommended for children, although evidence indicates referral for children to have such surgeries are becoming more frequent; and

(3) Genital and nongenital gender-altering surgery includes several irreversible and invasive procedures for biological males and biological females and involves the alteration of biologically healthy and functional body parts.

Laws 2023, LB574, § 15.